hyph-utf8/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/hyph-de-1996.tex
t2trau
t3trä
t3t4ro
tt5rom
tt3ru
tt3rü
tt2se
tt3sec
tt5se5h
tt3sel
tts1p
tt2s3ti
ttt4
t3tu
tt3z2
1tu
tu1alm
tu3an
2tub
3tuch
tu2chi
2tud
3tue
tue3re
tu3et
2tuf
tuf2e
tu3fen
t1u2fer
2tuh
2tu2k
tu3ka
t1ukr
tu3la
3t2um.
5tume
2tumf
2tumg
2tumk
tum2si
tum2so
2t1umt
3tun.
2t1una
2tund
3tu3ne
2t1unf
3tung
t1unga
tun2gl
tung6s
2tunif
2t1u4nio
2tunt
3tuö
t1up.
tu2ra
tur3a4g
tu3ras
tur3b
tur1c
tu4re.
tu2rei
tu2r1er
tur3ere
tu4res
tu2r3e4t
3turn
tu2ro
tu3rol
tur3s2
tu2ru
t2us
tu2sa
tu4schl
tu4so
tu3ta
2tüb
t3übe
3tüch
tück2s
1tüf
1tüm
1tür.
tür1c
1türe
1türg
1tür3s
3tüten
2t1v
t5vo
4t1w
twa4r
twi4e
1ty
2tyl
ty4le
3typ
ty2pa
ty3st
2t1z
t2z1a2
tz3an
tz3as
t2z1ä
t5ze.
t2z1e4c
t2z1eie
t2z1eis
tze4n
tz4ene
tz3ents
t2z1erl
t3ze2s
tz1imp
tz1ind
tz1int
t2zo
tz1of
t3zon
tz1or
tz4tin
t2z1w
2u.
u3a2b
u1a2c
ua3d
uad4r
u1al.
u3alet
u1alf
u3a2lo
u1alr
u1als
ual3t
ua2lu
u1am
u3ans
ua2p
u3ar.
uar3a2b
u3ars
ua3sa
ua2t3h
ua5t2i
u3au
u1ay
u1äm
u1äu
2u1b
u3be
ub6i
ub3lic
ub5los
u3blö
ub3lu
u2bop
ub3rä
ub5rit
ub2sa
ub2s1o
ub2spa
ub3um
u2b3üb
4uc
u1ce2
u2ch1a
u3cha.
uch3an
uch1ä
u1che
u2ch1e2c
uch1ei
u3ches
u1chi
uch3il
uch1in
uch3l
uch5m
uch3n
u2ch3r
uch2so
uch4spr
uchst4
uch4tor
uch2t3r
u1chu
uch3ü
uch3w
u2ckem
u4ckent
uck2er
u4ck3erl
u2cki
uck4sta
u1cr
2u1d
u5d2a
udens2
ude3r2e
udi3en
uditi4
u4don
ud3ra
u1e
ue4ck
u2ed
ue2en
u2eg
u4ela
ue2le
ue2mi
ue2n1
u3eni
uen3k
uen2zu
u2ep
ue2r3a
u3e2r1ä
ue2rei
uer5eife
u5eremp
u5erent
ue4rerg
uer3g2
u5erinf
u5erint
uerk4
uer4ne
uern3s4t
uer3o
u3err
uert2
u3erum
u3erunf
u3erunt
u3erur
u3erv
uer3z
ue2ta
ue4tek
uet4s
uf3ad
u3fah
uf1ak
ufall2
uf1ar
uf1au
u2f1äs
u2f1ä2ß
u2f1ei
u2f1em
u3fen.
u2fent
u2f1erh
uf2ern
2uff
uf3fe
uff4l
uf2fro
uf3l
u3fo2r
uf1ori
u1fö
uf3r
uf5sä
uft1eb
uft3s4
uft5sa
2u1g
u4gabte
ug1af
ug1ak
u2g1ap
uga4s
ug3asc
ug1au
u4g7e2i
u2g5ent
ug5erf
ug5erl
uge7sc
ugge4st
ug3hu
u2g1l
ug3lä
ug5lo
u3g4lö
u4g3lu
u2g3n
ugo3
ug1or
u2gö
u4g3reis
ug3ro
ug3rum
ug3rüs
ug5sc
ug3s2e
ug3si
ug3spa
ug4spr
ugs2t
ug5stä
ug3str
ugut2
u2gü
u1h
2uh.
uhe1ra
uhe1s4
uhe3st
uh1la
uh1lä
uh3ma
uh5me4
uhr1a
uhr3er
uh1ri
uh4rin
uhrt4
uhr3tr
uh2ru
uh1w
4ui
ui2ch
u1ie
ui1em
u3ig
u4ige
u3in.
u3isch.
u3ischs
uisi4n
ui4s3t
u1j
ukä2
u3käu
u1ke
u1ki
u1kl
u3kla
ukle1i
u3klo
u3klö
u5kö
u1k4r
uk2ta
uk2t3in
uk2t3r
u1ku
uku2s
u1l
ul1ab
ul1am
ul2ar
ula2s
ul1äm
ulb4
uld2se
u2l1el
ule4n
ul1erf
ul1erh
ul1erw
ules1a
ule2t
ul3eta
ul3fe
ulg4
uli2k
uli5ne
ul1ins
ul3ka
ul2kn
ull2a
ul2les
ull1s
ulm3ein
ulo2i
ul1or
ulö3s
ul2p1h
ul2sa
ul2sei
ul3sp
ulsu3
uls3z
ul4tar
ul2tau
ul3th
ul2tri
u2lü
ulz2
ul3zw
u2m3a2k
um1all
um2an
uman4s
um1anz
um1ar
um1aus
1umd
2ume
um4en
ument4s
umer2a
um1erg
um1erl
um1erw
1umf
1umg
um1ins
um1ir
1umk
1uml
2umm
um3m2a
um3n
u3mon
umpf4li
um2pl
ump3le
1umr
1umsat
um4ser
um2sim
um2s1pe
um1st
um2su
umt2
um3th
u2m3ur
1umz
u2n
2un.
2una.
1unab
un1ac
un4al
u3nam
u4n3an
un1ap
2u5nas
un3at
unau2
un1ä
4unc
un4dab
un4d1ac
1unddr
un4dei
und3erf
und5erha
un2did
un2do
un2d3r
und5re
4unds.
und3sp
un4d3um
1undvi
1undzw
un1e2
un3ein
un3el
une3re
un4es4
un3et
un2gä
1unget
1ungew
un1gl
1unglü
un2g1r
ung3ra
ung3ri
ung4s3
u3ni
un1ide
1u4nif
un1in
un1ir
2unis
un5isl
1u4niv
un2k1a
un2kn
un2kre
un2kro
unks2
unk3sp
unk4t3r
3unku
un2n3a2d
un5n4e
un3no
unn3s
un1o
uno4r
un2os
1unr
uns2
2uns.
unsch5el
un5se
1unsi
un3sk
un3sp
un2stu
1unt
un3ta
unte2
un3th
un3t4r
2untu
un1u
u3nut
unvol2
unvoll3
1unw
u1o2b
u3of
u3or.
u1or3c
u1os.
u1pa
u1pe2
uper1
up2fa
up3f2e
up2f1i
u3pfl
u3pi
up2pr
u1pr
up1ru
up1sl
up4t3a2
upt3erg
upt1o
up4tr
u1pu
u1q
4ur.
u1ra
u3ra.
u3raba
ura2be
u3rak
u3ral
ur3alg
u2r3a2m
ur1ana
ur2anb
u3rand
ur1ang
ur2anh
ur1ans
u3rant
ur3a6ren
u3rati
ur3att
ur1au
u3raz
2urä
ur1än
urb2
ur3ba
ur2ble
urch1
urch3s
urd2
ur3di
2ure
ur1eff
ure3g
u2rele
ure4n
u5ren.
u2rent
ur1erh
ur1erw
2urf
urg2a
ur2gri
urgros4
urgs2
urg3st
u1r2i
uri2c
u2r3im
ur3ind
ur1ini
ur3ins
ur1int
ur3inv
urk2s
1urlau
urm2a
urm3ang
2u1ro
uro3st
u1rö
2urr
ur3sac
ur2san
urs1au
ur6sei
ur4ser
ur6sin
ur2st
ur5st4r
ur4sw
urt2
ur5t4e
ur3th
u1ru
urü2
ur2za
ur2zä
ur2zi
ur2zo
ur2z1w
u4saf
us1an
us4ann
u2s1au
u6schent
usch5wer
us1ec
u2s1ei
u3seid
u5sep
use1ra
u2serp
us4et
usi3er.
usi5ers.
u3sik
us3oc
u3soh
u3sol
us1op
us3ou
u3sow
us3part
us1pas
us1pe
u3spek
us1pic
u5s2piz
us2por
us4sei
usse4n
uss5erfa
uss3erk
uss5ersu
us4sez
us2sof
uss3tät
ust1a2b
u3stal
u3stel
us1tr
us4tris
u3stu
u4stun
u4stur
us2ur
u2sü
u1sy
u1ß
ußen3
2u1t
u3taf
ut1alt
ut1a4m
u2t1ap
u2t3ar
ut1är
u3tät
u3te
u5te.
u4t1e4g
ute2l
ut2em
ute2n1
uten3e
u4tent
ute5r4er
u5tern
ut3ersa
u5tet
u4tev
u4t1ex
u2t1hi
u2t1ho
u2t1hu
uti2q
uto4ber
uto5c
uto3n4
ut1opf
u2tops
ut4or
u3tos
ut3rea
ut3rü
ut5sa
ut2s1ä
ut4schl
ut6schö
ut3sp
ut4spa
ut3te
ut3t4l
utts2
utt3sp
utu3ru
utz3eng
ut2zin
u1u4
uufe2
u1ü2
u1v4
u2ve.
uve3rä
u1w
uwa3s
u1x2
ux3t
u1ya
u1z
uze2
uz3ot
uz1we
uz3z4
1üb
2übd
übe2
übe3c
übe4r1
ü2b5l
3üb5r
üb2st
3übu
2üc
ü1che
üch3l
üch4s3c
üch5t4e
ück1er
ück5e4ri
ü4ckers
ück4spe
ü4d3a4
ü3den.
üden4g
ü3d2ens
üd1o4
üd1ö
ü4d5r
üd3s2
üdsa1
üd1t4
ü2f3a
ü2f1ei
ü2f1erg
üf2fl
ü2f1i
üf3l
ü1g
ü3ge
ü2g3l
ü2gn
üg3s
üg4st
üh1a
ü1he
ü2h1ei
ü2h1eng
ü2h1erk
ü2h1erz
üh1i
ühla2
ühl1ac
ühl1ag
üh5l2e
üh3li
üh3mi
üh3mo
üh5ne
ühner5ei
üh3r4e
ühr5ei.
üh5ro
ühr5ta
üh1s
üh3s2p
üh5te
ü1hu
üh1w
ü1k
2ül
ül1a
ül2c
ü5l4e
ül2la
ül2l1ei
ül2lo
ül4lö
ü1lu
ü4ment
2ün
ü2n1a
ün2c
ün2da
ün2dr
ünd1s
ün2f1
ün4f3ei
ün3fl
ün4fli
ünf3r
ün2g3l
ünn4s
ün2s
ün3sc
ün3sp
ün4st
ün5sta
ün5str
ün3th
ün2za
ü1pe
ü1pi
ü1pu
ür1a
ü2r1ei
ür2fl
ür4f3r
ür4g5eng
ü1ri
ü1r2o
üro3b
ü3rofe
üro1r
üro3st
ürr2
ür2s
ürs3tin
ürt2h
ür3the
ü1ru
ü2schl
üse3h
üse3l
üs4s3c
üs5se
üs2st
ü2st
üste3ne
ü1ß
ü1ta
ü2t1al
üt3r
üt2s1
üt2tr
ü1v
ü1z
2v.
3va.
2v1ab
va3c
va3ge
val2s
2vang
2v1arb
va3st
v4at
va2t3a6
va4tei
va2t3h
va4t1in
vati8ons.
va2t3r
vat3s2
vat3t
va2t1u
2v1au
2v1b
2v1d
ve2
3vea
ve3ar
ve3b
ve3c
ve3d
ve3g
ve3h
veit4
veits3
vek3
ve3la
ve4l1au
ve3le
ve3li
veli5ne
ve3lo
ve3ma
ve3mu
ve3nal
ve3ne
ve3ni
ven3k
ve3nö
ve3nu
ve3o
ver1
ver3a
ve3rad
ve5rand
ve5ras
ver3b4
ver3d2
vere2
ve3reie
ve3ren
verf4
verg4
ve3ri
ve5ris
ve5rit
ver3st
2vesc
2ve3se
ves1p
ves3ti
ve3ta
vete1
vete3r
ve3tr
2veü
ve3v
ve5x2
ve7xe
2v1f4
2v1g
2v1h
vi2a
vi3an
vi4a3t
vi4c
vi3de
vid3s2t
vie2h3a
vi2el
vi2er
vie2w1
vig2
vi3ka
vi2l1a
vi2leh
vi2l1in
2v1i2m
vi4na
vin2s
2v1int
3vio
vi3sa
vise4
vi5s2o
vi3s2u
vize5
2v1k
2v1l2
2v1m
2v1n
2v1ob
vo2gu
voll1a
voll5end
von3
2v1op
vo2r1
vor3a
vor3d
vor3g
vo3ri
vo5rig
vor3o
3voy
vö2c
2v1p
v3pf
v1ra
3vri
v1ro
2vs
vs2e
v3s2z
2v1t
2vumf
2v1v
2v1w
2v1z
4w.
w2a
wab2bl
wa5che
wa3d
waffe2
1wag
wa5ge
wa2g5n
wa2gr
wa3gra
3wah
wahl5ent
wah3ru
wai2b
1wal
3wald
wal4da
walt4st
wa5na
wang6s
wan4s
wa2p
wa2r
wa3ra
1war2e
ware1i
wa3ri
war3ste
wart4e
wa3ru
1wa2s
wa3sa
wa3se
wa3sh
wa3si
wass4
was7se
1wäh
1wäl
1wäs
wäs4c
wä5sche
wäs5se
w1b
2w1c
w1d
weat3
we3be
4webeb
we3cke
we5cke.
we5cken.
we5ckes
we3d
we2e2
weed1
we2fl
3weg
we2g1a
we2g5l
we4g3r
wegs4
weg3sp
1weh
we3he
wei4bl
2weie
weis4s3p
wei3str
wei3ße
wei4tr
weit3s
wel2s
wel3se
wel2t1
wel4t3a
wel6tend
wel4tr
wen3a6
we3ni
wen4k3ri
we2r3a
wer2bl
1werbu
werd2
werde3i
5werdens
1werdu
wer2fl
2werg
we4r1io
1werk.
1werke
wer2kl
wer2ku
wer2s
wer2t3a
wer4tei
wer6t5erm
wer4to
1werts
1we3se
we3si
we2s1p
we4st
west1a
west3ei
wes2t1o2
west3r
wes4tu
wet4s
wet4ta
wett3s
2w1g
w5ho
wi3cka
3wid
wi2e
wie3l
wie5ne
wie2st
wi3k2
wim2ma
wim4m3u
win4d3e4c
win2dr
win2e
win8n7ersc
wi4r
1wirt
wi5s4e
1wiss
wi3th
1witzl
3wj
2wk
2w1l
2w1m
wn3sh
1wo1c
wo2cha
woche4
1woh
woh4l
1wolf
wolf4s
wol4ler
wor3a
wo2r3i
wor2t3r
wo4r3u
wot2
1wöc
wört2h
wör3the
2w1p
1wr
w1ro
2ws
w3s4k
w1s2t
2w1t
w3ti2
w2u
1wuc
wul2
wul3se
wun2s
4wur.
wur2fa
wur4s
1wurst
wus2
wus3te
1wu4t1
1wüh
wül2
wün3
2w1w
6x.
x1a
1xa.
2x3ab
1xad
1xae
xa1fl
1x2a3g
xa4m
xa3me
xa5mer
2xan
x4anz
3xas
2x1b
x1c
4x1d
1xe
x1e4g
2xek
xe2l
xe3lei
x1em
7x2em.
xemp6
3x2en
xens4
xen3sa
x2er.
5xere
xers2
3xes
2x3eu
2x1f
2x1g
xge1
2x3h
1xi
xib4
xi1c
xich2
2xid
xide2
xi2d1em
x1i2do
xie3l
xi3g4
xi2lo
xi2l1u
xin3sk
x2i2s1
xi3sc
xi4se
xiso2
xis3s
xis2tä
x1i2tu
x1j
x1k4
2x3l
xlib6
x1m
2x1n
x1or
4x3p
x1q
x1r
2x3s2
4x1t
x2t1a
xt3an
xt4as
x2t1ä
x3tät
xtblo4
x2t1e2d
x2t1ei
x4tent
x2t1erf
xtra1b6
x2t3ran
xt3s2
x2t1u
x3tur
1xu
xu1a
x1u4n
xu2s1
x1v
2x1w
1xy.
1xys
x1z
2y1ab
1yac
y1al.
y1a2m
yan2g
y3ät
y1b
yb6r
y1c
y2chi
y3chis
ych5n
y1d
y3d4r
y1e
y2ef
yen4n
y2es
ye3sp
y3est
ye2th
y1f
y1g
ygie5
y1h
yhr2
y1i4
y1j
y1k4
yk5s
y1l
yl3a2m
y3lant.
y3lante
yl3c
y5len
y5ler
yli4n
yloni1
yls2
yl1st
y2l1u
yma4t
ym3p4
ympi3e
y2ne
y2n3o
yn3t
y1of
yom2
yon4i
y1ont
y3ou
y1p
ypa2
yp3an
ype2
yper3t
y3ph
y2p1in
ypo3
y4ps
yp3t
y1r
y3r2e
y3ri
yri1e
y5s4c
y1sé
ys2h
y3s2p
y2st4
ys1tr
y3s2ty
y3s2z
y1t
y2t2h
yu2r
yure3
y1v
y1w
y1y
y1z2
6z.
2z3a2b
za1c
z3a2d
za3de
2z1af
za3gr
3z2ah
2z3a2k
2z1all
2z1am
z3ambik
3zambiq
z1an
za2na
2z3anf
3zani
z3anl
3zar.
2z1arb
3za3re
z1arm
3zaro
za3st4
2z3at
3zaub
z1au2f
z3aug
3zaun
zä2
2z1äc
3z2äh
2z1äm
z1ärg
z1ärm
4z3b6
zbü1b
zbübe5
4z3c
2z3d
zdä1
zdi1st
1ze
ze3a
2zeck
ze1e
2z1eff
zei3la
zeile4
2z1ein
zei3s2
zei5sp
zeist4
zeit1a
zei4tak
zeit7ende
zei4t3er
zei2tr
zeit3sp
ze4l1a2
zel3ad
zel1er
zel1in
zel5la
zel3sz
zel3th
zelu2
ze5m4e
2z1emp
5zen.
ze4n1ac
zen5s2e
zen2ta
5zentr
zent3sk
2zentw
ze2nu
zen4zer
5z2er.
ze2r3a
ze2r1e2b
2z1ergä
4z3ergeb
z3erhal
2zerhö
ze3ri
zer3k2
3zerl.
5z2ern
zer4neb
zer6n3ei
2zerq
5zerr
z2ers
2z3ersa
4zerste
zert2a2
zer4t3ag
zer4ter
zer4tin
zer6t5rau
2zerz
3zerza
z1erzi
ze2sä
ze2s1i
ze3sku
ze2sp
zes6s5end
ze2st
zes3tr
ze2tr
2z1ex
2z3f
2z1g
zger2a
2z1h
z2hen
zhir5
zi3alo
zid5r
zi1erh
zi1es.
zig4s
zil2e
2zimp
3zine
zin4er
2z1inf
2z1inh
zin4ser
4zinsuf
2z1inv
zi2o
zi3op
zirk4
zirk6s
zi3s2z
zi1t2h
2z1j
2z3k4
zkü1b
2z1l
z3la
2z1m
2z3n2
znei3
2zob
2zof
z1oh
3zol
zol3lu
zon6ter
zo2o
zo2r
zo3re
zor4ne
zo5se
2z1osz
2zot
2z1ö2f
zö7li
2z3p2
2z1q
2z3r2
4z3s2
2z1t
z2t1au
z3te
z4tehe
zte3ma
zte3o
zte3str
z2t1h
z4t3hei
z3t2her
zt3ho
z3ti
zt1ins
zt3rec
zt3s
zu1
zu3a
zub4
zu5cke
zud4
zu3f4
zu2g1ar
zu3gl
zu2g1un
2z1uhr
2z1um.
zumen2
2zumf
2zumg
2zuml
2z1ums
zu3nä
zu3n2e
2zunt
zu3nu
zu3nü
zu3r2a
2z1urk
2z1url
2zurs
2z1urt
zu3s4
zu3t
zuz2
2züb
zür1c
2z1v
zw2
4zwah
zwan2d1
4z3wäl
2zweg
z2weig
2z1wel
2z1wen
2zwer
4zwerk
z1wes
4zwir
z2wit
2z1wo
2zwö
z1wur
2z1wü
zy1ank
4z1z
z3z4a
z3zi
zzi3s2
z3zo
zzoll2
}

\endinput

%%% Local Variables:
%%% mode: tex
%%% coding: utf-8
%%% End:
